Tennessee, session 114, SB0851.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-5-126, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
The governor is authorized to expand medicaid eligibility in accordance with the
federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Pub. L. No. 111-148). The governor
is authorized to negotiate with the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services
with respect to the terms of medicaid expansion.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0851
001182
- 1 -